Maryland, session 2026, HB1168.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
4–148.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1168*

HOUSE BILL 1168
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING TERMS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CREDIBLE ALLEGATION” MEANS A SPECIFIC AND PLAUSIBLE
REPORT OF SEXUAL MISCONDUCT OR SEXUAL ABUSE, MADE BY A PERSON WITH
APPARENT KNOWLEDGE, BY A SCHOOL EMPLOYEE OR CONTRACTOR OR VOLUNTEER
THAT IS SUFFICIENT TO WARRANT TEMPORARY PROTECTIVE ACTION BY THE LOCAL
SCHOOL SYSTEM.
(3) “RESPONSE RESPONSE POLICY” MEANS A SEXUAL ABUSE AND
MISCONDUCT RESPONSE POLICY.
(4) “SERIOUS INCIDENT” MEANS AN EVENT THAT POSES A
SUBSTANTIAL THREAT TO A STUDENT OR STAFF MEMBER’S SAFETY OR SCHOOL
ENVIRONMENT AND REQUIRES IMMEDIATE ADMINISTRATIVE OR
LAW–ENFORCEMENT RESPONSE, INCLUDING:
(I) CREDIBLE ALLEGATIONS OF SEXUAL MISCONDUCT OR
SEXUAL ABUSE THAT RESULT IN REMOVAL FROM STUDENT CONTACT FOR MORE
THAN 10 DAYS;
(II) PHYSICAL ASSAULT;
(III) OFFENSES INVOLVING A WEAPON;
(IV) THREATS OF VIOLENCE;
(V) CHILD ABUSE OR NEGLECT;
(VI) EVENTS THAT REQUIRE EMERGENCY RESPONSE; AND
(VII) ANY OTHER INCIDENT DESIGNATED BY THE LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEM AS REQUIRING A FORMAL AFTER–ACTION REVIEW.
(B) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP A MODEL SEXUAL ABUSE AND
MISCONDUCT RESPONSE POLICY FOR USE BY LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEMS TO RESPOND
TO CREDIBLE SCHOOL–RELATED ALLEGATIONS OF SEXUAL ABUSE AND SEXUAL
MISCONDUCT.
(2) THE MODEL RESPONSE POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL, AT MINIMUM, INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING
COMPONENTS:

HOUSE BILL 1168 3
(I) A COMMUNICATIONS PLAN;
(II) AN E–MAIL AND OTHER ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION
DOCUMENTS RETENTION POLICY;
(III) A REQUIREMENT TO LINK TO A CENTRALIZED RESOURCE
PLATFORM; AND
(IV) AN AFTER–ACTION REVIEW PLAN.
(3) THE MODEL RESPONSE POLICY MAY NOT IMPEDE OR
COMPROMISE THE ABILITY OF A SCHOOL, A SCHOOL SYSTEM, A LAW ENFORCEMENT
AGENCY, OR A PROSECUTOR TO CONDUCT A THOROUGH AND UNBIASED
INVESTIGATION INTO AN ALLEGATION OF SEXUAL ABUSE OR SEXUAL MISCONDUCT.
(I) A REQUIREMENT THAT A PARENT OR GUARDIAN RECEIVE
PROMPT NOTIFICATION THAT THE STUDENT HAS MADE A CREDIBLE ALLEGATION OF
A SERIOUS INCIDENT;
(II) A COMMUNICATIONS PLAN THAT PROVIDES LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEMS WITH THE INFORMATION AUTHORIZED TO BE SHARED WITH THE PUBLIC
AT EACH STAGE OF THE RESPONSE PROCESS;
(III) A REQUIREMENT THAT, SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (E) OF
THIS SECTION, NOTIFICATION OF AN ALLEGATION OF CHILD ABUSE BY AN
EMPLOYEE OF THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM BE PROVIDED TO THE CHILD’S PARENT
OR GUARDIAN AS SOON AS POSSIBLE AND NOT LATER THAN WITHIN 3 SCHOOL DAYS;
AND
(IV) RECORD RETENTION REQUIREMENTS AND GUIDELINES
DEVELOPED IN COLLABORATION WITH THE STATE ARCHIVES, INCLUDING:
1. A REQUIREMENT THAT ALL E–MAIL AND ELECTRONIC
RECORDS REGARDING A CREDIBLE ALLEGATION OF SEXUAL ABUSE OR SEXUAL
MISCONDUCT BY AN EMPLOYEE OF THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM BE RETAINED BY
THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM FOR A MINIMUM OF 3 YEARS;
2. PROCEDURES FOR THE MAINTENANCE, SECURITY,
AND TRANSFER OF RECORDS; AND
3. GUIDELINES REGARDING RETAINING RECORDS FOR
CRIMINAL, CIVIL, OR ADMINISTRATIVE INVESTIGATIONS.

HOUSE BILL 1168
(C) (1) THE COMPONENTS OF THE MODEL RESPONSE POLICY
DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE THE
INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION AND BE DEVELOPED IN
COLLABORATION WITH STATE AND LOCAL GOVERNMENTAL ENTITIES, COMMUNITY
STAKEHOLDERS, AND ANY OTHER RELEVANT ENTITIES DETERMINED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(2) THE COMMUNICATIONS PLAN SHALL INCLUDE BEST PRACTICES
FOR PROVIDING TIMELY, RELEVANT, AND APPROPRIATE INFORMATION THROUGH
NOTIFICATION AND RESPONSES TO PARENTS OF AFFECTED STUDENTS AND
COMMUNITY STAKEHOLDERS AND LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM CONTACT INFORMATION.
(3) THE E–MAIL AND OTHER ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION
DOCUMENTS RETENTION POLICY SHALL INCLUDE REQUIREMENTS FOR THE
RETENTION AND MAINTENANCE OF A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM’S E–MAILS AND OTHER
ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION DOCUMENTS FOR A MINIMUM OF 1 YEAR.
(4) A CENTRALIZED, STATEWIDE RESOURCE PLATFORM, DEVELOPED
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE MODEL RESPONSE POLICY, SHALL INCLUDE
INFORMATION AND PROVIDE LINKS TO RESOURCES REGARDING CHILD SEXUAL
ABUSE AND SEXUAL MISCONDUCT IN A SCHOOL ENVIRONMENT.
(5) AN AFTER–ACTION REVIEW PLAN, DEVELOPED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE MODEL RESPONSE POLICY, SHALL REQUIRE A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM TO
CONDUCT A STRUCTURED, COLLABORATIVE DEBRIEFING PROCESS TO IDENTIFY,
ASSESS, EVALUATE, AND RESOLVE ANY ISSUE WITH ANY ACTION TAKEN BY AN
ENTITY INVOLVED IN A SCHOOL–RELATED CASE OF SEXUAL ABUSE AND SEXUAL
MISCONDUCT TO IMPROVE FUTURE PERFORMANCE.
(C) (D) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY SEPTEMBER 1, 2027, EACH LOCAL
SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL ADOPT A RESPONSE POLICY BASED ON THE MODEL POLICY
DEVELOPED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) EACH LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL POST IN A CONSPICUOUS
PLACE ON ITS WEBSITE A LINK TO THE CENTRALIZED RESOURCE PLATFORM
DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) EACH LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM’S RESPONSE POLICY MAY NOT
IMPEDE OR COMPROMISE THE ABILITY OF A SCHOOL, THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM,
A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, OR A PROSECUTOR TO CONDUCT A THOROUGH AND
UNBIASED INVESTIGATION INTO AN ALLEGATION OF SEXUAL ABUSE OR SEXUAL
MISCONDUCT.

HOUSE BILL 1168 5
(D) EACH LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL ESTABLISH A TIME–STAMPED
WEBPAGE ON ITS WEBSITE REGARDING A SERIOUS INCIDENT THAT:
(1) CONFIRMS THE NATURE OF THE INCIDENT;
(2) PROVIDES NONIDENTIFYING INFORMATION ABOUT THE STATUS
OF THE ONGOING INVESTIGATION;
(3) PROVIDES LINKS TO RELEVANT RESOURCES FOR PARENTS AND
GUARDIANS FOR COUNSELING AND SUPPORT RESOURCES;
(4) PROVIDES AN UPDATE WHEN THERE IS A MATERIAL CHANGE,
INCLUDING THE CONCLUSION OF THE INVESTIGATION OR AN ONGOING CRIMINAL
CASE; AND
(5) CONTAINS SUPPORTING AND NONINVESTIGATIVE INFORMATION
ONLY.
(E) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OR A CHILD PROTECTIVE SERVICES UNIT
MAY REQUEST THAT CERTAIN DETAILS OF A SERIOUS INCIDENT BE WITHHELD FROM
THE PUBLIC OR THAT PUBLIC COMMUNICATION BE DELAYED.
(F) (1) A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL NOTIFY PARENTS AND
GUARDIANS THAT THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM HAS RECEIVED A CREDIBLE
ALLEGATION AS SOON AS FEASIBLE AFTER THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM IS MADE
AWARE OF THE CREDIBLE ALLEGATION.
(2) THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) CONFIRM THAT A CREDIBLE ALLEGATION WAS RECEIVED;
(II) INDICATE WHETHER THE EMPLOYEE WAS REMOVED FROM
STUDENT CONTACT;
(III) DESCRIBE THE SAFETY PRECAUTIONS BEING TAKEN BY THE
LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM; AND
(IV) LIST REFERRALS TO AVAILABLE COUNSELING AND
SUPPORT RESOURCES, IF ANY.

HOUSE BILL 1168
(3) A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM MAY NOT DISCLOSE THE NAME OF THE
EMPLOYEE UNDER INVESTIGATION IN THE NOTICE SENT TO PARENTS AND
GUARDIANS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(G) (1) ON THE CONCLUSION OF A CHILD SEXUAL ABUSE OR SEXUAL
MISCONDUCT CASE OR A SERIOUS INCIDENT, A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL
CONDUCT AN AFTER–ACTION REVIEW WITHIN 45 DAYS OF THE CONCLUSION OF THE
INCIDENT TO:
(I) ANALYZE HOW THE INCIDENT OCCURRED;
(II) IDENTIFY SYSTEMIC AND ENVIRONMENTAL CONDITIONS
THAT CONTRIBUTED TO THE INCIDENT;
(III) IDENTIFY GAPS IN PROCEDURES, COMMUNICATION,
SUPERVISION, OR CULTURE;
(IV) EVALUATE THE TIMELINESS OF PARENT AND GUARDIAN
NOTIFICATION;
(V) EXAMINE COORDINATION WITH LAW ENFORCEMENT AND
CHILD PROTECTIVE SERVICES;
(VI) EVALUATE COMPLIANCE WITH TRANSPARENCY
REQUIREMENTS; AND
(VII) IDENTIFY AREAS FOR PROCESS IMPROVEMENTS.
(2) A WRITTEN REDACTED REPORT OF THE FINDINGS OF THE
AFTER–ACTION REVIEW CONDUCTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
MAY BE PROVIDED TO THE STATE BOARD AND THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.